Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.050

Validity of consents, relinquishments, or orders of termination from other jurisdictions—Burden of proof.

Any consent, relinquishment, or order of termination that would be valid in the jurisdiction in which it was executed or obtained, and which comports with due process of law, is valid in Washington state, but the burden of proof as to validity and compliance is on the petitioner.

[ 1984 c 155 s 5.]